test/src/morphology/V-kuuldw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kūldõ: # Verb 55 'eng /est kuulata/fin' - full paradigm
     kūldõ+V+Inf: kūldõ
     kūldõ+V+Ger: kūldõs
     kūldõ+V+Ger: kūldõs
     kūldõ+V+Sup: kūldõm
     kūldõ+V+Sup+Ine: kūldõmõs
     kūldõ+V+Sup+Ela: kūldõmõst
     kūldõ+V+Sup+Tra: kūldõmõks
     kūldõ+V+Sup+Abe: kūldõmõt
     kūldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kūldõb
     kūldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kūldõt
     kūldõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kūldõbõd
     kūldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kūldiz
     kūldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kūldizt, kūldiztõ]
     kūldõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kūldizt, kūldiztõ]
     kūldõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kūld
     kūldõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kūldõks
     kūldõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kūld
     kūldõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kūld
     kūldõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kūldõgid
     kūldõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kūldõg
     kūldõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kūldiji
     kūldõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kūldõn
     kūldõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kūldtõd
